vendor/wikimedia/langconv/fst/crh-exceptions.foma
  [ {ё} -> {ö} || [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] _ ] .o.
  [ {Ё} -> {Ö} || [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] _ ] .o.
  [ {Ё} -> {YO} || _ [ [{А}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Е}|{Ё}|{Ж}|{З}|{И}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{О}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{У}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{Ъ}|{Ы}|{Ь}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Я}|{C}|{Ğ}|{Ñ}|{Q}|{Ö}|{Ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {Ю} -> {YU} || _ [ [{А}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Е}|{Ё}|{Ж}|{З}|{И}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{О}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{У}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{Ъ}|{Ы}|{Ь}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Я}|{C}|{Ğ}|{Ñ}|{Q}|{Ö}|{Ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {Ц} -> {TS} || _ [ [{А}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Е}|{Ё}|{Ж}|{З}|{И}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{О}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{У}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{Ъ}|{Ы}|{Ь}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Я}|{C}|{Ğ}|{Ñ}|{Q}|{Ö}|{Ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {Щ} -> {ŞÇ} || _ [ [{А}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Е}|{Ё}|{Ж}|{З}|{И}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{О}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{У}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{Ъ}|{Ы}|{Ь}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Я}|{C}|{Ğ}|{Ñ}|{Q}|{Ö}|{Ü}] ] ]
];
define CRH'LATN'PATTERNS(br) CRH'LATN'PATTERNS'1(br) .o. CRH'LATN'PATTERNS'2(br) .o. CRH'LATN'PATTERNS'3(br);
define CRH'CYRL'PATTERNS'1(br) [
  [ {köyüm} @-> {коюм} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {Köyüm} @-> {Коюм} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {KÖYÜM} @-> {КОЮМ} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {köyüñ} @-> {коюнъ} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {Köyüñ} @-> {Коюнъ} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {KÖYÜÑ} @-> {КОЮНЪ} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {küye} @-> {куе} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {Küye} @-> {Куе} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {KÜYE} @-> {КУЕ} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {kürkke} @-> {куркке} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {Kürkke} @-> {Куркке} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {KÜRKKE} @-> {КУРККЕ} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {kürkni} @-> {куркни} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {Kürkni} @-> {Куркни} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {KÜRKNİ} @-> {КУРКНИ} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {kürkte} @-> {куркте} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {Kürkte} @-> {Куркте} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {KÜRKTE} @-> {КУРКТЕ} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {kürkçü} @-> {куркчю} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {Kürkçü} @-> {Куркчю} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {KÜRKÇÜ} @-> {КУРКЧЮ} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {köyü} @-> {кою} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {Köyü} @-> {Кою} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {KÖYÜ} @-> {КОЮ} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {jizn} @-> {жизнь} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {Jizn} @-> {Жизнь} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {JİZN} @-> {ЖИЗНЬ} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {r} {o} {l} -> {роль} || [.#.|br] _ [ [\[{ü}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {R} {o} {l} -> {Роль} || [.#.|br] _ [ [\[{ü}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {R} {O} {L} -> {РОЛЬ} || [.#.|br] _ [ [\[{Ü}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {ü} {s} {t} -> {усть} || [.#.|br] _ [ [\[{ü}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {Ü} {s} {t} -> {Усть} || [.#.|br] _ [ [\[{ü}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {Ü} {S} {T} -> {УСТЬ} || [.#.|br] _ [ [\[{Ü}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {köm-kök} @-> {ком-кок} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {Köm-kök} @-> {Ком-кок} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {KÖM-KÖK} @-> {КОМ-КОК} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {ial} @-> {иаль} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {İal} @-> {Иаль} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {İAL} @-> {ИАЛЬ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {nul} @-> {нуль} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Nul} @-> {Нуль} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {NUL} @-> {НУЛЬ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {köy} @-> {кой} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Köy} @-> {Кой} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {KÖY} @-> {КОЙ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {köyniñ} @-> {койнинъ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Köyniñ} @-> {Койнинъ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {KÖYNİÑ} @-> {КОЙНИНЪ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {köyni} @-> {койни} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Köyni} @-> {Койни} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {KÖYNİ} @-> {КОЙНИ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {köyge} @-> {койге} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Köyge} @-> {Койге} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {KÖYGE} @-> {КОЙГЕ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {köyde} @-> {койде} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Köyde} @-> {Койде} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {KÖYDE} @-> {КОЙДЕ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {köydeki} @-> {койдеки} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Köydeki} @-> {Койдеки} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {KÖYDEKİ} @-> {КОЙДЕКИ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {köyden} @-> {койден} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Köyden} @-> {Койден} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {KÖYDEN} @-> {КОЙДЕН} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {köz} @-> {козь} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Köz} @-> {Козь} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {KÖZ} @-> {КОЗЬ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {-ünci} @-> {-юнджи} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {-ÜNCİ} @-> {-ЮНДЖИ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {-üncide} @-> {-юнджиде} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {-ÜNCİDE} @-> {-ЮНДЖИДЕ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {-ünciden} @-> {-юнджиден} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {-ÜNCİDEN} @-> {-ЮНДЖИДЕН} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {etsin} @-> {етсин} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Etsin} @-> {Етсин} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ETSİN} @-> {ЕТСИН} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {lnaya} @-> {льная} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Lnaya} @-> {Льная} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {LNAYA} @-> {ЛЬНАЯ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {lnoye} @-> {льное} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Lnoye} @-> {Льное} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {LNOYE} @-> {ЛЬНОЕ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {lnıy} @-> {льный} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Lnıy} @-> {Льный} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {LNIY} @-> {ЛЬНЫЙ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {lniy} @-> {льний} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Lniy} @-> {Льний} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {LNİY} @-> {ЛЬНИЙ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {lskaya} @-> {льская} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Lskaya} @-> {Льская} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {LSKAYA} @-> {ЛЬСКАЯ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {lskiy} @-> {льский} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Lskiy} @-> {Льский} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {LSKİY} @-> {ЛЬСКИЙ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {lskoye} @-> {льское} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Lskoye} @-> {Льское} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {LSKOYE} @-> {ЛЬСКОЕ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {opol} @-> {ополь} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Opol} @-> {Ополь} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {OPOL} @-> {ОПОЛЬ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {şçeye} @-> {щее} || _ [br|.#.] ]
];
define CRH'CYRL'PATTERNS'2(br) [
  [ {Şçeye} @-> {Щее} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ŞÇEYE} @-> {ЩЕЕ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {şçiy} @-> {щий} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Şçiy} @-> {Щий} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ŞÇİY} @-> {ЩИЙ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {şçaya} @-> {щая} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Şçaya} @-> {Щая} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ŞÇAYA} @-> {ЩАЯ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {tseps} @-> {цепс} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Tseps} @-> {Цепс} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {TSEPS} @-> {ЦЕПС} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {an} @-> {ань} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {An} @-> {Ань} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {AN} @-> {АНЬ} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ange} @-> {аньге} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Ange} @-> {Аньге} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ANGE} @-> {АНЬГЕ} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ande} @-> {аньде} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Ande} @-> {Аньде} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ANDE} @-> {АНЬДЕ} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {anki} @-> {аньки} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Anki} @-> {Аньки} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ANKİ} @-> {АНЬКИ} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {deral} @-> {деръал} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Deral} @-> {Деръал} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {DERAL} @-> {ДЕРЪАЛ} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {kör} @-> {кёр} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Kör} @-> {Кёр} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {KÖR} @-> {КЁР} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {mer} @-> {мэр} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Mer} @-> {Мэр} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {MER} @-> {МЭР} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {джонк} @-> {cönk} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {Джонк} @-> {Cönk} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {ДЖОНК} @-> {CÖNK} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {куркчи} @-> {kürkçi} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {Куркчи} @-> {Kürkçi} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {КУРКЧИ} @-> {KÜRKÇI} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ [..] -> {ь} || [.#.|br] [ [{y}|{Y}] ] {ö} [ [{ç}|{n}|{r}|{s}|{t}|{z}|{Ç}|{N}|{R}|{S}|{T}|{Z}] ] _ [ [{a}|{A}|{u}|{U}|{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] | [br|.#.] ] ] .o.
  [ [..] -> {Ь} || [.#.|br] [ [{y}|{Y}] ] {Ö} [ [{ç}|{n}|{r}|{s}|{t}|{z}|{Ç}|{N}|{R}|{S}|{T}|{Z}] ] _ [ [{a}|{A}|{u}|{U}|{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] | [br|.#.] ] ] .o.
  [ {A} {Q} {Ş} -> {АКъШ} || [.#.|br] _ [ [\[{A}|{E}|{I}]] | [br|.#.] ] ] .o.
  [ [..] -> {ь} || [.#.|br] [ [{y}|{Y}] ] {ü} [ [{ç}|{n}|{r}|{s}|{t}|{z}|{Ç}|{N}|{R}|{S}|{T}|{Z}] ] _ [ [{a}|{A}|{u}|{U}|{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] | [br|.#.] ] ] .o.
  [ [..] -> {Ь} || [.#.|br] [ [{y}|{Y}] ] {Ü} [ [{ç}|{n}|{r}|{s}|{t}|{z}|{Ç}|{N}|{R}|{S}|{T}|{Z}] ] _ [ [{a}|{A}|{u}|{U}|{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] | [br|.#.] ] ] .o.
  [ [..] -> {ь} || [.#.|br] [ [{b}|{c}|{g}|{k}|{p}|{ş}|{B}|{C}|{G}|{K}|{P}|{Ş}] ] {ö} [ [{ç}|{n}|{r}|{s}|{t}|{z}|{Ç}|{N}|{R}|{S}|{T}|{Z}] ] _ [ [{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] | [br|.#.] ] ] .o.
  [ [..] -> {Ь} || [.#.|br] [ [{b}|{c}|{g}|{k}|{p}|{ş}|{B}|{C}|{G}|{K}|{P}|{Ş}] ] {Ö} [ [{ç}|{n}|{r}|{s}|{t}|{z}|{Ç}|{N}|{R}|{S}|{T}|{Z}] ] _ [ [{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] | [br|.#.] ] ] .o.
  [ [..] -> {ь} || [.#.|br] [ [{b}|{c}|{g}|{k}|{p}|{ş}|{B}|{C}|{G}|{K}|{P}|{Ş}] ] {ü} [ [{ç}|{n}|{r}|{s}|{t}|{z}|{Ç}|{N}|{R}|{S}|{T}|{Z}] ] _ [ [{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] | [br|.#.] ] ] .o.
  [ [..] -> {Ь} || [.#.|br] [ [{b}|{c}|{g}|{k}|{p}|{ş}|{B}|{C}|{G}|{K}|{P}|{Ş}] ] {Ü} [ [{ç}|{n}|{r}|{s}|{t}|{z}|{Ç}|{N}|{R}|{S}|{T}|{Z}] ] _ [ [{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] | [br|.#.] ] ] .o.
  [ [..] -> {ь} || [.#.|br] {ö} [ [{ç}|{n}|{r}|{s}|{t}|{z}|{Ç}|{N}|{R}|{S}|{T}|{Z}|{p}|{P}] ] _ [ [{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] | [br|.#.] ] ] .o.
  [ [..] -> {ь} || [.#.|br] {Ö} [ [{ç}|{n}|{r}|{s}|{t}|{z}|{p}] ] _ [ [{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] | [br|.#.] ] ] .o.
  [ [..] -> {Ь} || [.#.|br] {Ö} [ [{Ç}|{N}|{R}|{S}|{T}|{Z}|{P}] ] _ [ [{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] | [br|.#.] ] ] .o.
  [ [..] -> {ь} || [.#.|br] {ü} [ [{ç}|{n}|{r}|{s}|{t}|{z}|{Ç}|{N}|{R}|{S}|{T}|{Z}] ] _ [ [{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] | [br|.#.] ] ] .o.
  [ [..] -> {ь} || [.#.|br] {Ü} [ [{ç}|{n}|{r}|{s}|{t}|{z}] ] _ [ [{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] | [br|.#.] ] ] .o.
